Arkansas, session 2025, HB1458.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-95-107(b)(2)(A), concerning the
definition of "credentialing information" that the Arkansas State Medical
Board can provide to credentialing organizations, is amended to read as
follows:
(A) Information regarding a physician's:
(i) Professional training, qualifications,
background, practice history, and experience, for example, status of medical
license;
(ii) Clinical hospital privileges;
(iii) Status of United States Drug Enforcement
Administration certificate;
*JMB301*
02/11/2025 4:39:07 PM JMB301

HB1458
(iv) Education, training, and board certification;
(v)(iv) Work history;
(vi)(v) Current malpractice coverage;
(vii)(vi) History of professional liability or
malpractice claims;
(viii)(vii) Drug or alcohol abuse to the extent
permitted by law;
(ix)(viii) History of board appearances;
(x)(ix) Loss, surrender, restriction, or suspension
of license;
(xi)(x) Felony convictions;
(xii)(xi) History of loss or limitation of
privileges or disciplinary activity;
(xiii)(xii) Attestation of the correctness and
completeness of the application; and
(xiv)(xiii) History of Medicare or Medicaid or other
sanctions; and



















02/11/2025 4:39:07 PM JMB301